Hawaii statutes.
§152-1 Definitions. For the purpose of
this chapter, unless otherwise required by context:

"Control noxious weed" means to limit
the spread of a specific noxious weed and to reduce its density to a degree
where its injurious, harmful, or deleterious effect is reduced to a tolerable
level.

"Cooperative agreement" means an
agreement between the department and the landowner and land occupier for the
control or eradication of a noxious weed infestation.

"Department" means the department of
agriculture.

"Eradicate noxious weed" means to
completely destroy and eliminate existing plant growth, seeds, and vegetative
reproductive plant parts of a specific noxious weed from a given locality.

"Land occupier" means a person who
occupies, resides on, or utilizes land or real estate of a landowner.

"Landowner" means the possessor of a
fee simple absolute title in land or real estate and shall include the State
and its political subdivisions in their capacities as owners of public lands.

"Noxious weed" means any plant
species which is, or which may be likely to become, injurious, harmful, or
deleterious to the agricultural, horticultural, aquacultural, or livestock
industry of the State and to forest and recreational areas and conservation
districts of the State, as determined and designated by the department from
time to time.

"Person" means any individual, firm,
corporation, association, or partnership. [L 1957, c 319, pt of §1; am L Sp
1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132, §2; Supp, §27A-2; HRS §152-1; am L 1974, c
234, §1; am L 1975, c 44, pt of §1; am L 1987, c 92, §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next